Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1737 N 1
SFX 1737 0 Order .

SFX 1738 N 1
SFX 1738 0 OrderConeOptimization .

SFX 1739 N 1
SFX 1739 0 OrderedSequence .

SFX 1740 N 1
SFX 1740 0 Ordering .

SFX 1741 N 1
SFX 1741 0 orealistic .

SFX 1742 N 1
SFX 1742 0 orFunction .

SFX 1743 N 1
SFX 1743 0 Orientation .

SFX 1744 N 1
SFX 1744 0 OrientationFilter .

SFX 1745 N 1
SFX 1745 0 Origin .

SFX 1746 N 1
SFX 1746 0 Original .

SFX 1747 N 1
SFX 1747 0 orInformation .

SFX 1748 N 1
SFX 1748 0 orMeasurements .

SFX 1749 N 1
SFX 1749 0 orMeasurementsObject .

SFX 1750 N 1
SFX 1750 0 ornoid .

SFX 1751 N 1
SFX 1751 0 orrhoeae .

SFX 1752 N 1
SFX 1752 0 os .

SFX 1753 N 1
SFX 1753 0 osacron .

SFX 1754 N 1
SFX 1754 0 osahedron .

SFX 1755 N 1
SFX 1755 0 oses .

SFX 1756 N 1
SFX 1756 0 osidodecahedron .

SFX 1757 N 1
SFX 1757 0 ot .

SFX 1758 N 1
SFX 1758 0 oulomb .

SFX 1759 N 1
SFX 1759 0 oulombs .

SFX 1760 N 1
SFX 1760 0 ous .

SFX 1761 N 1
SFX 1761 0 out3D .

SFX 1762 N 1
SFX 1762 0 out3DPreviewer .

SFX 1763 N 1
SFX 1763 0 OutputFormatType .

SFX 1764 N 1
SFX 1764 0 OutputStreamMethod .

SFX 1765 N 1
SFX 1765 0 ov .

SFX 1766 N 1
SFX 1766 0 over .

SFX 1767 N 1
SFX 1767 0 OverallConstant .

SFX 1768 N 1
SFX 1768 0 OverlapsQ .

SFX 1769 N 1
SFX 1769 0 ovich .

SFX 1770 N 1
SFX 1770 0 P .

SFX 1771 N 1
SFX 1771 0 Package .

SFX 1772 N 1
SFX 1772 0 Packages .

SFX 1773 N 1
SFX 1773 0 Packet .

SFX 1774 N 1
SFX 1774 0 Pad .

SFX 1775 N 1
SFX 1775 0 Padding .

SFX 1776 N 1
SFX 1776 0 PadLeft .

SFX 1777 N 1
SFX 1777 0 PadRight .

SFX 1778 N 1
SFX 1778 0 PageBreakInformationPacket .

SFX 1779 N 1
SFX 1779 0 PageBreaks .

SFX 1780 N 1
SFX 1780 0 Pair .

SFX 1781 N 1
SFX 1781 0 PairList .

SFX 1782 N 1
SFX 1782 0 Pale .

SFX 1783 N 1
SFX 1783 0 Pane .

SFX 1784 N 1
SFX 1784 0 PaneBox .

SFX 1785 N 1
SFX 1785 0 PaneBoxOptions .

SFX 1786 N 1
SFX 1786 0 Parameters .

SFX 1787 N 1
SFX 1787 0 ParametersDelta .

SFX 1788 N 1
SFX 1788 0 Parse .

SFX 1789 N 1
SFX 1789 0 Part .

SFX 1790 N 1
SFX 1790 0 Partition .

SFX 1791 N 1
SFX 1791 0 Partitions .

SFX 1792 N 1
SFX 1792 0 Parts .

SFX 1793 N 1
SFX 1793 0 pascal .

SFX 1794 N 1
SFX 1794 0 pascals .

SFX 1795 N 1
SFX 1795 0 PassageTimeDistribution .

SFX 1796 N 1
SFX 1796 0 passFilter .

SFX 1797 N 1
SFX 1797 0 Path .

SFX 1798 N 1
SFX 1798 0 Pattern .

SFX 1799 N 1
SFX 1799 0 PatternSequence .

SFX 1800 N 1
SFX 1800 0 Peaks .

SFX 1801 N 1
SFX 1801 0 pentakis .

SFX 1802 N 1
SFX 1802 0 Permissions .

SFX 1803 N 1
SFX 1803 0 Permutation .

SFX 1804 N 1
SFX 1804 0 Permutations .

SFX 1805 N 1
SFX 1805 0 pes .

SFX 1806 N 1
SFX 1806 0 peses .

SFX 1807 N 1
SFX 1807 0 Phi .

SFX 1808 N 1
SFX 1808 0 pingStyle .

SFX 1809 N 1
SFX 1809 0 PixelValue .

SFX 1810 N 1
SFX 1810 0 Placeholder .

SFX 1811 N 1
SFX 1811 0 Placement .

SFX 1812 N 1
SFX 1812 0 planar .

SFX 1813 N 1
SFX 1813 0 Planes .

SFX 1814 N 1
SFX 1814 0 PlanesStyle .

SFX 1815 N 1
SFX 1815 0 plex .

SFX 1816 N 1
SFX 1816 0 Plot .

SFX 1817 N 1
SFX 1817 0 Plot3D .

SFX 1818 N 1
SFX 1818 0 Plus .

SFX 1819 N 1
SFX 1819 0 PlusLayer .

SFX 1820 N 1
SFX 1820 0 point .

SFX 1821 N 1
SFX 1821 0 Point .

SFX 1822 N 1
SFX 1822 0 Points .

SFX 1823 N 1
SFX 1823 0 PoissonProcess .

SFX 1824 N 1
SFX 1824 0 PoissonWindow .

SFX 1825 N 1
SFX 1825 0 Poles .

SFX 1826 N 1
SFX 1826 0 PolyaField .

SFX 1827 N 1
SFX 1827 0 Polygon .

SFX 1828 N 1
SFX 1828 0 Polyhedron .

SFX 1829 N 1
SFX 1829 0 Polynomial .

SFX 1830 N 1
SFX 1830 0 Position .

SFX 1831 N 1
SFX 1831 0 Positions .

SFX 1832 N 1
SFX 1832 0 PostAction .

SFX 1833 N 1
SFX 1833 0 PostmanTour .

SFX 1834 N 1
SFX 1834 0 PostScriptName .

SFX 1835 N 1
SFX 1835 0 Power .

SFX 1836 N 1
SFX 1836 0 PPrime .

SFX 1837 N 1
SFX 1837 0 Pr .

SFX 1838 N 1
SFX 1838 0 PreAction .

SFX 1839 N 1
SFX 1839 0 Precision .

SFX 1840 N 1
SFX 1840 0 Predict .

SFX 1841 N 1
SFX 1841 0 Prediction .

SFX 1842 N 1
SFX 1842 0 PredictionCITable .

SFX 1843 N 1
SFX 1843 0 PredictionObject .

SFX 1844 N 1
SFX 1844 0 PredictiveInterface .

SFX 1845 N 1
SFX 1845 0 PredictorFunction .

SFX 1846 N 1
SFX 1846 0 Prefetch .

SFX 1847 N 1
SFX 1847 0 Prefix .

SFX 1848 N 1
SFX 1848 0 PrePrint .

SFX 1849 N 1
SFX 1849 0 PreprocessingFunction .

SFX 1850 N 1
SFX 1850 0 Prime .

SFX 1851 N 1
SFX 1851 0 PrimeExponent .

SFX 1852 N 1
SFX 1852 0 PrimeExponentQ .

SFX 1853 N 1
SFX 1853 0 Primitives .

SFX 1854 N 1
SFX 1854 0 Print .

SFX 1855 N 1
SFX 1855 0 PrintPrecision .

SFX 1856 N 1
SFX 1856 0 Probability .

SFX 1857 N 1
SFX 1857 0 ProcessParameters .

SFX 1858 N 1
SFX 1858 0 Product .

SFX 1859 N 1
SFX 1859 0 Progress .

SFX 1860 N 1
SFX 1860 0 Prolog .

SFX 1861 N 1
SFX 1861 0 Properties .

SFX 1862 N 1
SFX 1862 0 Property .

SFX 1863 N 1
SFX 1863 0 PropertyClass .

SFX 1864 N 1
SFX 1864 0 Protect .

SFX 1865 N 1
SFX 1865 0 Protected .

SFX 1866 N 1
SFX 1866 0 psonGroupTh .

SFX 1867 N 1
SFX 1867 0 Purple .

SFX 1868 N 1
SFX 1868 0 PValue .

SFX 1869 N 1
SFX 1869 0 Q .

SFX 1870 N 1
SFX 1870 0 QualityGoal .

SFX 1871 N 1
SFX 1871 0 Quantile .

SFX 1872 N 1
SFX 1872 0 Quantity .

SFX 1873 N 1
SFX 1873 0 Quartiles .

SFX 1874 N 1
SFX 1874 0 QuaternionQ .

SFX 1875 N 1
SFX 1875 0 que .

SFX 1876 N 1
SFX 1876 0 QueryDecode .

SFX 1877 N 1
SFX 1877 0 QueryEncode .

SFX 1878 N 1
SFX 1878 0 QuestionMark .

SFX 1879 N 1
SFX 1879 0 quoon .

SFX 1880 N 1
SFX 1880 0 quoons .

SFX 1881 N 1
SFX 1881 0 r .

SFX 1882 N 1
SFX 1882 0 R .

SFX 1883 N 1
SFX 1883 0 radian .

SFX 1884 N 1
SFX 1884 0 radians .

SFX 1885 N 1
SFX 1885 0 RadiationLaw .

SFX 1886 N 1
SFX 1886 0 radius .

SFX 1887 N 1
SFX 1887 0 Radon .

SFX 1888 N 1
SFX 1888 0 RadonTransform .

SFX 1889 N 1
SFX 1889 0 RandomGraph .

SFX 1890 N 1
SFX 1890 0 Range .

SFX 1891 N 1
SFX 1891 0 RangeClipping .

SFX 1892 N 1
SFX 1892 0 RangeClipPlanesStyle .

SFX 1893 N 1
SFX 1893 0 RangePadding .

SFX 1894 N 1
SFX 1894 0 rAngle .

SFX 1895 N 1
SFX 1895 0 RankCorrelation .

SFX 1896 N 1
SFX 1896 0 RankTest .

SFX 1897 N 1
SFX 1897 0 rás .

SFX 1898 N 1
SFX 1898 0 rásfai .

SFX 1899 N 1
SFX 1899 0 Rate .

SFX 1900 N 1
SFX 1900 0 Ratio .

SFX 1901 N 1
SFX 1901 0 RatioCI .

SFX 1902 N 1
SFX 1902 0 Rationals .

SFX 1903 N 1
SFX 1903 0 Ratios .

SFX 1904 N 1
SFX 1904 0 RatioTest .

SFX 1905 N 1
SFX 1905 0 ré .

SFX 1906 N 1
SFX 1906 0 Read .

SFX 1907 N 1
SFX 1907 0 ReadBinary .

SFX 1908 N 1
SFX 1908 0 ReadMessage .

SFX 1909 N 1
SFX 1909 0 ReadyQ .

SFX 1910 N 1
SFX 1910 0 Real .

SFX 1911 N 1
SFX 1911 0 Reals .

SFX 1912 N 1
SFX 1912 0 ReceiptFunction .

SFX 1913 N 1
SFX 1913 0 Reduce .

SFX 1914 N 1
SFX 1914 0 Reduction .

SFX 1915 N 1
SFX 1915 0 RedViolet .

SFX 1916 N 1
SFX 1916 0 Reencoding .

SFX 1917 N 1
SFX 1917 0 Reference .

SFX 1918 N 1
SFX 1918 0 RefinementFunction .

SFX 1919 N 1
SFX 1919 0 Region .

SFX 1920 N 1
SFX 1920 0 RegionQ .

SFX 1921 N 1
SFX 1921 0 Register .

SFX 1922 N 1
SFX 1922 0 RegisterSequence .

SFX 1923 N 1
SFX 1923 0 Regularization .

SFX 1924 N 1
SFX 1924 0 Regularized .

SFX 1925 N 1
SFX 1925 0 reini .

SFX 1926 N 1
SFX 1926 0 Remainder .

SFX 1927 N 1
SFX 1927 0 Remove .

SFX 1928 N 1
SFX 1928 0 Repeat .

SFX 1929 N 1
SFX 1929 0 Repeated .

SFX 1930 N 1
SFX 1930 0 Replace .

SFX 1931 N 1
SFX 1931 0 ReplaceList .

SFX 1932 N 1
SFX 1932 0 ReplacePart .

SFX 1933 N 1
SFX 1933 0 Report .

SFX 1934 N 1
SFX 1934 0 Resample .

SFX 1935 N 1
SFX 1935 0 Rescale .

SFX 1936 N 1
SFX 1936 0 Reshape .

SFX 1937 N 1
SFX 1937 0 Residuals .

SFX 1938 N 1
SFX 1938 0 Resize .

SFX 1939 N 1
SFX 1939 0 Resource .

SFX 1940 N 1
SFX 1940 0 Resources .

SFX 1941 N 1
SFX 1941 0 Response .

SFX 1942 N 1
SFX 1942 0 ResponseTime .

SFX 1943 N 1
SFX 1943 0 RestLayer .

SFX 1944 N 1
SFX 1944 0 Result .

SFX 1945 N 1
SFX 1945 0 ResultsObject .

SFX 1946 N 1
SFX 1946 0 Return .

SFX 1947 N 1
SFX 1947 0 Reverse .

SFX 1948 N 1
SFX 1948 0 ReverseLayer .

SFX 1949 N 1
SFX 1949 0 ReverseLexicographic .

SFX 1950 N 1
SFX 1950 0 rFunction .

SFX 1951 N 1
SFX 1951 0 rgan .

SFX 1952 N 1
SFX 1952 0 rgans .

SFX 1953 N 1
SFX 1953 0 rGraph .
