Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.dic
AiryAi/1850,2405
AiryBi/1850,2405
Around/1930
Band/1796
Baseline/1830
BoundaryMesh/1919,1920
capric/1750
Ceva/1820
Conjugate/1790,2278
ConsoleMessage/1773
ConvertToPostScript/1773
CreatePalette/1773
CycleGraph/1869
Databin/32,1927
DeviceOpen/1869
DiagonalMatrix/1869
Didot/1821
DifferenceRoot/1913
DimensionReduce/1950
DirectedGraph/1869
Dispatch/1869
dodecic/1753,1754,1756
Ellipsoid/1871,1873
EllipticTheta/1850
enantiomorph/1760
Evaluate/570,1773,2008
Expression/395,1773,2323
Ferrier/1850
GeoBounds/1919
GeoGridRange/1775
GeoRange/1775
googol/1815
Hypergeometric0F1/1924
Hypergeometric1F1/1924
Hypergeometric2F1/1924
HypergeometricPFQ/1924
Inhomogeneous/1823
Inner/1827,1828,1858
Interpolation/1737,1822,1839
IrreduciblePolynomial/1869
Kantor/1769
KEdgeConnectedGraph/1869
KVertexConnectedGraph/1869
Large/1881,1998
Legendre/1770,1869,2291
Lerch/1807
Lexicographic/1804,2143
Marcum/1869
Mersenne/1851,1852
Minkowski/1878
Minus/1818
MixedRadix/1872
NetReplace/1789
NetTrain/1945
NumericArray/1869,2291
Options/1773,1798
Orderless/1799
Outer/1827,1828
palmi/1805,1806,2224,2259
PerfectNumber/1869
PermutationCycles/1869
PermutationGroup/1869
PermutationList/1869
phot/1741
Pick/1766
PixelValue/1831
Placeholder/1930
Plana/1894,1953,1954,1955
PolarAxes/1745
PowerList/1869,2249
Quotient/1926
Rabin/1769
Refresh/1899
ScorerGi/1850
ScorerHi/1850
Second/1738
SetOptions/1773
Signature/1803
SimpleGraph/1869
Spearman/1895,1896,1956
SpellingDictionaries/1797
SpheroidalPS/1850
SpheroidalQS/1850
SpheroidalS1/1850
SpheroidalS2/1850
Squarefree/1789
stathm/1752,1755,1994
stella/1801
Temporary/1847,2327
TextSearch/1933
TimeObject/1869
tola/1881,1968,1994
TreeGraph/1869
True/1869
Tutte/1829
TwoSided/1868
UndirectedGraph/1869
Union/1818,2040
WolframAlpha/582,1872,1944
WorldFrame/1792
XShadow/1830
YShadow/1830
Zernike/1882
ZShadow/1830
$Context/1797
